Maryland, session 2025, SB0009.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
11–105.
(a) (1) In this section, “emerging workforce need program” means a graduate
level program identified by the Commission [in the State Plan for Higher Education or each
annual update to the workforce needs as an appendix to the Plan] under subsection
(c)(2)(i)1 of this section that:
(i) No institution of higher education in the State offers;
(ii) Addresses a job or industry need that is innovative, unique, and
rare; and
(iii) Could leverage federal, State, or private resources on a
long–term basis with immediate development by an institution of higher education.
(2) “Emerging workforce need program” does not mean a specific academic
program identified by the Commission to fulfill or support an identified current State and
regional workforce need.
(c) (2) (i) In consultation with the governing boards and agencies
concerned with postsecondary education in the State, the Commission shall develop and
periodically update an overall plan consistent with the Charter, known as the State Plan
for Higher Education, that shall identify:
1. The present and future needs for postsecondary education
and research throughout the State, including current and emerging State and regional
workforce needs AND ANY SPECIFIC ACADEMIC PROGRAMS INSTITUTIONS COULD
DEVELOP TO FULFILL OR SUPPORT IDENTIFIED CURRENT STATE AND REGIONAL
WORKFORCE NEEDS AND ANY EMERGING WORKFORCE NEED PROGRAMS in
accordance with subparagraph (iv) of this paragraph;
2. The present and future capabilities of the different
institutions and segments of postsecondary education in the State, [and] INCLUDING any
specific academic programs institutions could develop to fulfill or support identified
[current State and regional workforce needs and any emerging workforce need programs]
WORKFORCE NEEDS; and
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 143
3. The long–range and short–range objectives and priorities
for postsecondary education and methods and guidelines for achieving and maintaining
them.
11–206.
(b) (1) [Subject to § 11–206.5 of this subtitle, prior] PRIOR to the proposed
date of implementation, the governing body of an institution of postsecondary education
shall submit to the Commission each proposal for:
(i) A new program; or
(ii) A substantial modification of an existing program.
11–206.1.
(b) (1) [Subject to § 11–206.5 of this subtitle, a] A president of a public
institution of higher education may propose to establish a new program or abolish an
existing program if the action:
(i) Is consistent with the institution’s adopted mission statement
under Subtitle 3 of this title; and
(ii) Can be implemented within the existing program resources of
the institution.
(2) [Subject to § 11–206.5 of this subtitle, a] A president of a private
nonprofit institution of higher education may propose to establish a new program if the
action:
(i) Is consistent with the mission statement published in the official
catalog of the private nonprofit institution; and
(ii) Can be implemented within the existing resources of the
institution.
(3) The president of a public institution of higher education shall report
any programs that are proposed to be established or abolished in accordance with
paragraph (1) of this subsection to:
(i) The institution’s governing board; and
(ii) The Maryland Higher Education Commission.
– 3 –

Ch. 143 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(4) The president of a private nonprofit institution of higher education
shall report any programs that are proposed to be established in accordance with paragraph
(2) of this subsection to the Commission.
(5) Upon receipt of a proposed new program, the Commission shall notify
all other institutions of higher education in the State.
11–206.3.
(a) In this section, “institution” means [a]:
(1) A public senior higher education institution; OR
(2) A PRIVATE NONPROFIT INSTITUTION OF HIGHER EDUCATION.
(b) (1) Beginning January 1, 2025, the Commission shall require each
institution to submit a letter of intent to the Commission that identifies each new graduate
level program that an institution intends to propose for approval under § 11–206 or §
11–206.1 of this subtitle.
(2) The Commission shall require each institution to submit a letter of
intent every 6 months.
(3) The letter of intent shall include all new graduate programs the
institution intends to propose within the 6–month to 2–year time period following
submission of the letter of intent.
(c) The Commission shall use a letter of intent submitted by an institution under
this section:
(1) To facilitate collaboration between institutions; and
(2) To provide feedback to an institution before the institution submits the
new program to the Commission for approval, including any Commission concerns
regarding unreasonable or unnecessary program duplication.
(d) (1) The Commission may not use a letter of intent to establish any
preference or priority for approval of a program proposal.
(2) THIS SECTION MAY NOT BE CONSTRUED TO GIVE AN INSTITUTION
THE RIGHT OF FIRST REFUSAL FOR ANY PROGRAM INCLUDED IN A LETTER OF
INTENT SUBMITTED TO THE COMMISSION UNDER THIS SECTION.
– 4 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 143
(e) (1) Subject to [paragraph] PARAGRAPHS (2) AND (3) of this subsection,
the Commission shall establish requirements for submitting a letter of intent under this
section, including the format, deadlines, and review criteria of the letters.
(2) The Commission [shall circulate each letter of intent submitted by an
institution among each institution, but] may not post an institution’s letter of intent
publicly.
(3) (I) AFTER REVIEW OF THE LETTERS OF INTENT SUBMITTED BY
EACH INSTITUTION UNDER THIS SECTION, THE COMMISSION SHALL DETERMINE
WHETHER AN INTENDED PROGRAM IS SIMILAR TO AN EXISTING PROGRAM OR
ANOTHER INTENDED PROGRAM INCLUDED IN ANOTHER INSTITUTION’S LETTER OF
INTENT.
(II) IF THE COMMISSION DETERMINES THAT AN INTENDED
PROGRAM IS SIMILAR TO ANOTHER PROGRAM UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS
PARAGRAPH, THE COMMISSION MAY NOTIFY THE AFFECTED INSTITUTIONS OF ITS
DETERMINATION, PROVIDE FEEDBACK, AND ENCOURAGE DISCUSSION AND
COLLABORATION BETWEEN THE INSTITUTIONS.
[11–206.5.
(a) In this section, “emerging workforce need program” has the meaning stated in
§ 11–105(a) of this title.
(b) This section applies on or after adoption by the Commission of the updated
State Plan for Higher Education due January 1, 2025.
(c) Subject to subsection (d) of this section, the Commission may approve a
proposal submitted under § 11–206, § 11–206.1, or § 11–206.4 of this subtitle only for an
academic program for an emerging workforce need program for:
(1) Bowie State University;
(2) Coppin State University;
(3) Morgan State University;
(4) The University of Maryland, College Park Campus as the State’s
flagship campus with programs and faculty nationally and internationally recognized for
excellence in research and the advancement of knowledge; and
(5) University of Maryland Eastern Shore.
– 5 –

Ch. 143 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(d) (1) Subject to paragraph (2) of this subsection, if an institution of higher
education does not submit a proposal under § 11–206, § 11–206.1, or § 11–206.4 of this
subtitle for an academic program for an emerging workforce need program within 1 year
after the quadrennial review of the State Plan for Higher Education, and each annual
update to the workforce needs as an appendix to the Plan that identified the emerging
workforce need program, any institution of postsecondary education in the State may
submit the proposal for approval by the Commission under §§ 11–206, 11–206.1, and
11–206.4 of this subtitle.
(2) (i) 1. Within 90 days after the quadrennial review of the State
Plan for Higher Education, and each annual update to the workforce needs as an appendix
to the Plan, each institution listed in subsection (c) of this section shall communicate to the
Commission a notice of intent to submit an academic program for an emerging workforce
need program identified in the Plan in the upcoming year.
2. The Commission shall:
A. Share the notice to all segments of higher education;
B. Facilitate collaboration between institutions of higher
education;
C. Provide feedback to an institution before an institution
submits the new program to the Commission for approval; and
D. Identify State resources to assist the institution in
developing the program.
(ii) If an institution of higher education listed in subsection (c) of this
section collaborates with any other institution of higher education in the State, at the
discretion of each institution, to implement an emerging workforce need program within 1
year after the quadrennial review of the State Plan for Higher Education, and each annual
update to the workforce needs as an appendix to the Plan that identified the emerging
workforce need program, the Commission may approve a proposal for an academic program
for an emerging workforce need program for the institution of higher education
collaborating with an institution listed in subsection (c) of this section.
(iii) If no institution listed in subsection (c) of this section provides
notice to the Commission of intent in accordance with this paragraph to submit an academic
program for an emerging workforce need program identified in the quadrennial review of
the State Plan for Higher Education, and each annual update to the workforce needs as an
appendix to the Plan, in the upcoming year, any institution of higher education may
immediately submit a proposal under § 11–206, § 11–206.1, or § 11–206.4 of this subtitle
for an academic program for an emerging workforce need program.
– 6 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 143
(e) The Commission shall adopt regulations for the implementation of this
section.]
Chapter 963 of the Acts of 2024
SECTION 4. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That:
(a) On or before January 1, 2025, the Maryland Higher Education Commission
shall update the State Plan for Higher Education last revised in 2022 to include updated
[information on] State and regional workforce needs[, emerging workforce needs, and any
specific academic programs institutions could develop to fulfill or support identified needs.
(b) The Maryland Higher Education Commission shall submit the update under
subsection (a) of this section to the Legislative Policy Committee for review and comment
before adoption] INFORMATION.
[(c)] (B) During the process of updating the State Plan under subsection (a) of
this section, the Commission shall provide postsecondary education stakeholders with an
opportunity to provide input on State and regional workforce needs issues relevant to the
purposes and objectives of the State Plan for Higher Education, including students,
members of the public, and major industry partners.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That Section(s) 11–206.6 through
11–206.8 of Article – Education of the Annotated Code of Maryland be renumbered to be
Section(s) 11–206.5 through 11–206.7, respectively.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act is an emergency
measure, is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public health or safety, has
been passed by a yea and nay vote supported by three–fifths of all the members elected to
each of the two Houses of the General Assembly, and shall take effect from the date it is
enacted.
Approved by the Governor, April 22, 2025.
– 7 –